California statutes. Penal Code
 to prevent unauthorized wireless communication by a prisoner in a state or local correctional facility, including a juvenile facility.

(5) The interruption of a communication service to transmit an emergency notice that includes, but is not limited to, an Amber Alert, a message transmitted through the federal Emergency Alert System, or a message transmitted through the federal Wireless Emergency Alert System.

(6) An interruption of a communication service pursuant to a statute that expressly authorizes an interruption of a communication service, including Sections 149 and 7099.10 of the Business and Professions Code and Sections 2876, 5322, and 5371.6 of the Public Utilities Code.

(7) An interruption of communication
 service that results from the execution of a search warrant.

(b) Nothing in this section provides authority for an action of a type listed in subdivision (a) or limits any remedy that may be available under law if an action of a type listed in subdivision (a) is taken unlawfully.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 322, Sec. 1.   (AB 1034)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11482.

This article does not restrict, expand, or otherwise modify the authority of the Public Utilities Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 322, Sec. 1.   (AB 1034)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 1.5. STATEWIDE PROGRAMS OF EDUCATION, TRAINING, AND RESEARCH FOR LOCAL PUBLIC PROSECUTORS AND PUBLIC DEFENDERS [11500. - 11504.]

11500.

The purpose of this title is to improve the administration of criminal justice by providing funding for statewide programs of education, training, and research for local public prosecutors and public defenders.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 116, Sec. 1.   Effective March 16, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

11501.

(a) There is hereby established in the Office of Emergency Services, a program of financial assistance to provide for statewide programs of education, training, and research for local public prosecutors and public defenders. All funds made available to the office for the purposes of this chapter shall be administered and distributed by the Director of Emergency Services.

(b) The Director of Emergency Services is authorized to allocate and award funds to public agencies or private nonprofit organizations for purposes of establishing statewide programs of education, training, and research for public prosecutors and public defenders, which programs meet criteria established pursuant
 to Section 11502.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 423.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

11502.

(a) Criteria for selection of education, training, and research programs for local public prosecutors and public defenders shall be developed by the Office of Emergency Services in consultation with an advisory group entitled the Prosecutors and Public Defenders Education and Training Advisory Committee.

(b) The Prosecutors and Public Defenders Education and Training Advisory Committee shall be composed of six local public prosecutors and six local public defender representatives, all of whom are appointed by the Director of Emergency Services, who shall provide staff services to the advisory committee. In appointing the members of the committee, the director shall invite the Attorney General,
 the State Public Defender, the Speaker of the Assembly, and the Senate President pro Tempore to participate as ex officio members of the committee.

(c) The Office of Emergency Services, in consultation with the advisory committee, shall develop specific guidelines including criteria for selection of organizations to provide education, training, and research services.

(d) In determining the equitable allocation of funds between prosecution and defense functions, the Office of Emergency Services and the advisory committee shall give consideration to the amount of local government expenditures on a statewide basis for the support of those functions.

(e) The administration of the overall program shall be performed by the
 Office of Emergency Services. The office may, out of any appropriation for this program, expend an amount not to exceed 7.5 percent for any fiscal year for those purposes.

(f) No funds appropriated pursuant to this title shall be used to support a legislative advocate.

(g) To the extent necessary to meet the requirements of the State Bar of California relating to certification of training for legal specialists, the executive director shall ensure that, where appropriate, all programs funded under this title are open to all members of the State Bar of California. The program guidelines established pursuant to subdivision (c) shall provide for the reimbursement of costs for all participants deemed eligible by the Office of Emergency Services, in conjunction with the Legal Training
 Advisory Committee, by means of course attendance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 424.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

11503.

There is hereby created in the State Treasury the Local Public Prosecutors and Public Defenders Training Fund for the support of the Prosecutors and Public Defenders Education and Training Program, established pursuant to this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 40, Sec. 1.   Effective March 31, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

11504.

To the extent funds are appropriated from the Assessment Fund to the Local Public Prosecutors and Public Defenders Training Fund established pursuant to Section 11503, the Office of Emergency Services shall allocate financial resources for statewide programs of education, training, and research for local public prosecutors and public defenders.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 425.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 2. SENTENCE ENHANCEMENTS [12001. - 12022.95.]

12001.

As used in this title, “firearm” has the meaning provided in subdivision (a) of Section 16520.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 5.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

12003.

If any section, subdivision, paragraph, subparagraph, sentence, clause, or phrase of this title or any other provision listed in Section 16580 is for any reason held to be unconstitutional, that decision shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of this title or any other provision listed in Section 16580. The Legislature hereby declares that it would have passed this title and any other provision listed in Section 16580, and each section, subdivision, paragraph, subparagraph, sentence, clause, and phrase thereof, irrespective of the fact that any one or more other sections, subdivisions, paragraphs, subparagraphs, sentences, clauses, or phrases be declared unconstitutional.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711) by Stats. 2011, Ch. 285, Sec. 24.   (AB 1402)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

12021.5.

(a) Every person who carries a loaded or unloaded firearm on his or her person, or in a vehicle, during the commission or attempted commission of any street gang crimes described in subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 186.22, shall, upon conviction of the felony or attempted felony, be punished by an additional term of imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for one, two, or three years in the court’s discretion. The court shall impose the middle term unless there are circumstances in aggravation or mitigation. The court shall state the reasons for its enhancement choice on the record at the time of sentence.

(b) Every person who carries a loaded or unloaded firearm together
 with a detachable shotgun magazine, a detachable pistol magazine, a detachable magazine, or a belt-feeding device on his or her person, or in a vehicle, during the commission or attempted commission of any street gang crimes described in subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 186.22, shall, upon conviction of the felony or attempted felony, be punished by an additional term of imprisonment in the state prison for two, three, or four years in the court’s discretion. The court shall impose the middle term unless there are circumstances in aggravation or mitigation. The court shall state the reasons for its enhancement choice on the record at the time of sentence.

(c) As used in this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Detachable magazine” means a device that is designed or redesigned
 to do all of the following:

(A) To be attached to a rifle that is designed or redesigned to
 fire ammunition.

(B) To be attached to, and detached from, a rifle that is designed or redesigned to fire ammunition.

(C) To feed ammunition continuously and directly into the loading mechanism of a rifle that is designed or redesigned to fire ammunition.

(2) “Detachable pistol magazine” means a device that is designed or redesigned to do all of the following:

(A) To be attached to a semiautomatic firearm that is not a rifle or shotgun that is designed or redesigned to fire ammunition.

(B) To be attached to, and detached from, a firearm that is not a rifle or shotgun that is designed
 or redesigned to fire ammunition.

(C) To feed ammunition continuously and directly into the loading mechanism of a firearm that is not a rifle or a shotgun that is designed or redesigned to fire ammunition.

(3) “Detachable shotgun magazine” means a device that is designed or redesigned to do all of the following:

(A) To be attached to a firearm that is designed or redesigned to fire a fixed shotgun shell through a smooth or rifled bore.

(B) To be attached to, and detached from, a firearm that is designed or redesigned to fire a fixed shotgun shell through a smooth bore.

(C) To feed fixed shotgun
 shells continuously and directly into the loading mechanism of a firearm that is designed or redesigned to fire a fixed shotgun shell.

(4) “Belt-feeding device” means a device that is designed or redesigned to continuously feed ammunition into the loading mechanism of a machinegun or a semiautomatic firearm.

(5) “Rifle” shall have the same meaning as specified in Section 17090.

(6) “Shotgun” shall have the same meaning as specified in Section 17190.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2022.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 508, Sec. 12) by Stats. 2016, Ch. 887, Sec. 12.   (SB 1016)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2022, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

12022.

(a) (1) Except as provided in subdivisions (c) and (d), a person who is armed with a firearm in the commission of a felony or attempted felony shall be punished by an additional and consecutive term of imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for one year, unless the arming is an element of that offense. This additional term shall apply to a person who is a principal in the commission of a felony or attempted felony if one or more of the principals is armed with a firearm, whether or not the person is personally armed with a firearm.

(2) Except as provided in subdivision (c), and notwithstanding subdivision (d), if the firearm is an assault weapon, as defined in Section 30510 or 30515, or a machinegun, as defined in Section
 16880, or a .50 BMG rifle, as defined in Section 30530, the additional and consecutive term described in this subdivision shall be three years imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 whether or not the arming is an element of the offense of which the person was convicted. The additional term provided in this paragraph shall apply to any person who is a principal in the commission of a felony or attempted felony if one or more of the principals is armed with an assault weapon, machinegun, or a .50 BMG rifle, whether or not the person is personally armed with an assault weapon, machinegun, or a .50 BMG rifle.

(b) (1) A person who personally uses a deadly or dangerous weapon in the commission of a felony or attempted felony shall be punished by an additional and consecutive term of imprisonment in the state prison for one year, unless use of a deadly or dangerous weapon is an element of that offense.

(2) If the person described in paragraph (1) has been convicted of carjacking or attempted carjacking, the additional term shall be in the state prison for one, two, or three years.

(3) When a person is found to have personally used a deadly or dangerous weapon in the commission of a felony or attempted felony as provided in this subdivision and the weapon is owned by that person, the court shall order that the weapon be deemed a nuisance and disposed of in the manner provided in Sections 18000 and 18005.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding the enhancement set forth in subdivision (a), a person who is personally armed with a firearm in the commission of a violation or attempted violation of Section 11351, 11351.5, 11352, 11366.5, 11366.6, 11378, 11378.5, 11379, 11379.5, or 11379.6 of the Health and Safety Code
 shall be punished by an additional and consecutive term of imprisonment in the state prison for three, four, or five years.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (9) of subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, a defendant convicted of an underlying violation specified in this subdivision who admits an enhancement pursuant to this subdivision or for whom an enhancement pursuant to this subdivision is found true, is punishable by imprisonment in the state prison and not pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code.

(d) Notwithstanding the enhancement set forth in subdivision (a), a person who is not personally armed with a firearm who, knowing that another principal is personally armed with a firearm, is a principal in the commission of an offense or attempted offense specified in subdivision (c), shall be punished by an additional and consecutive term of
 imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for one, two, or three years.

(e) For purposes of imposing an enhancement under Section 1170.1, the enhancements under this section shall count as a single enhancement.

(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the court may strike the additional punishment for the enhancements provided in subdivision (c) or (d) in an unusual case where the interests of justice would best be served, if the court specifies on the record and enters into the minutes the circumstances indicating that the interests of justice would best be served by that disposition.

(History: Amended November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 36, Sec. 10.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 36 at the November 5, 2024, election.)
-------------------------------------------

12022.1.

(a) For the purposes of this section only:

(1) “Primary offense” means a felony offense for which a person has been released from custody on bail or on his or her own recognizance prior to the judgment becoming final, including the disposition of any appeal, or for which release on bail or his or her own recognizance has been revoked. In cases where the court has granted a stay of execution of a county jail commitment or state prison commitment, “primary offense” also means a felony offense for which a person is out of custody during the period of time between the pronouncement of judgment and the time the person actually surrenders into custody or is otherwise returned to custody.

(2) “Secondary
 offense” means a felony offense alleged to have been committed while the person is released from custody for a primary offense.

(b) Any person arrested for a secondary offense that was alleged to have been committed while that person was released from custody on a primary offense shall be subject to a penalty enhancement of an additional two years, which shall be served consecutive to any other term imposed by the court.

(c) The enhancement allegation provided in subdivision (b) shall be pleaded in the information or indictment which alleges the secondary offense, or in the information or indictment of the primary offense if a conviction has already occurred in the secondary offense, and shall be proved as provided by law. The enhancement allegation may be pleaded in a complaint but need not be proved at the preliminary hearing or grand jury hearing.

(d) Whenever there is a conviction for the secondary offense and the enhancement is proved, and the person is sentenced on the secondary offense prior to the conviction of the primary offense, the imposition of the enhancement shall be stayed pending imposition of the sentence for the primary offense. The stay shall be lifted by the court hearing the primary offense at the time of sentencing for that offense and shall be recorded in the abstract of judgment. If the person is acquitted of the primary offense the stay shall be permanent.

(e) If the person is convicted of a felony for the primary offense, is sentenced to state prison for the primary offense, and is convicted of a felony for the secondary offense, any sentence for the secondary offense shall be consecutive to the primary sentence and the aggregate term shall be served in the state prison, even if the term for the
 secondary offense specifies imprisonment in county jail pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(f) If the person is convicted of a felony for the primary offense, is granted probation for the primary offense, and is convicted of a felony for the secondary offense, any sentence for the secondary offense shall be enhanced as provided in subdivision (b).

(g) If the primary offense conviction is reversed on appeal, the enhancement shall be suspended pending retrial of that felony. Upon retrial and reconviction, the enhancement shall be reimposed. If the person is no longer in custody for the secondary offense upon reconviction of the primary offense, the court may, at its discretion, reimpose the enhancement and order him or her recommitted to custody.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 76, Sec. 167.   (AB 383)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

12022.10.

(a) When a person sells, exchanges, or returns for value, or attempts to sell, exchange, or return for value, property acquired through one or more acts of shoplifting, theft, or burglary from a retail business, whether or not the person committed the act of shoplifting, theft, or burglary, the court shall impose an additional term as follows:

(1) If the property value exceeds fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), the court, in addition and consecutive to the punishment prescribed for the crime of which the defendant has been convicted, shall impose an additional term of one year.

(2) If the property value exceeds
 two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000), the court, in addition and consecutive to the punishment prescribed for the crime of which the defendant has been convicted, shall impose an additional term of two years.

(3) If the property value exceeds one million dollars ($1,000,000), the court, in addition and consecutive to the punishment prescribed for the crime of which the defendant has been convicted, shall impose an additional term of three years.

(4) If the property value exceeds three million dollars ($3,000,000), the court, in addition and consecutive to the punishment prescribed for the crime of which the defendant has been convicted, shall impose an additional term of four years.

(5) For each property value of
 three million dollars ($3,000,000), the court shall impose a term of one year in addition to the term specified in paragraph (4).

(b) When a person acts in concert with another to sell, exchange, or return for value, or attempts to sell, exchange, or return for value, property acquired through one or more acts of shoplifting, theft, or burglary from a retail business, whether or not the person committed the act of shoplifting, theft, or burglary, the court shall impose the additional term specified in subdivision (a).

(c) In an accusatory pleading involving multiple charges of sales, exchanges, or returns for value, or attempts to do the same, the additional terms provided in this section may be imposed when the aggregate value of the property involved exceeds the amounts specified in
 this section and arises from a common scheme or plan. All pleadings under this section are subject to the rules of joinder and severance stated in Section 954.

(d) The additional terms provided in this section shall not be imposed unless the facts relating to the amounts provided in this section are charged in the accusatory pleading and admitted by the defendant or found to be true by the trier of fact.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, the court may impose an enhancement pursuant to this section and another section on a single count.

(f) It is the intent
 of the Legislature that the provisions of this section be reviewed within five years to consider the effects of inflation on the additional terms imposed. For that reason, this section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1, 2030, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 174, Sec. 1.   (SB 1416)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

12022.2.

(a) Any person who, while armed with a firearm in the commission or attempted commission of any felony, has in his or her immediate possession ammunition for the firearm designed primarily to penetrate metal or armor, shall upon conviction of that felony or attempted felony, in addition and consecutive to the punishment prescribed for the felony or attempted felony, be punished by an additional term of 3, 4, or 10 years. The court shall order the middle term unless there are circumstances in aggravation or mitigation. The court shall state the reasons for its enhancement choice on the record at the time of the sentence.

(b) Any person who wears a body vest in the commission or attempted
 commission of a violent offense, as defined in Section 29905, shall, upon conviction of that felony or attempted felony, in addition and consecutive to the punishment prescribed for the felony or attempted felony of which he or she has been convicted, be punished by an additional term of one, two, or five years. The court shall order the middle term unless there are circumstances in aggravation or mitigation. The court shall state the reasons for its enhancement choice on the record at the time of the sentence.

(c) As used in this section, “body vest” means any bullet-resistant material intended to provide ballistic and trauma protection for the wearer.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2022.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 508, Sec. 14) by Stats. 2016, Ch. 887, Sec. 14.   (SB 1016)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2022, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

12022.3.

For each violation of Section 220 involving a specified sexual offense, or for each violation or attempted violation of Section 261, 264.1, 286, 287, 288, or 289, or former Section 262 or 288a, and in addition to the sentence provided, a person shall receive the following:

(a) A 3-, 4-, or 10-year enhancement if the person uses a firearm or a deadly weapon in the commission of the violation.

(b) A one-, two-, or five-year enhancement if the person is armed with a firearm or a deadly weapon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 626, Sec. 64.   (AB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

12022.4.

(a) Any person who, during the commission or attempted commission of a felony, furnishes or offers to furnish a firearm to another for the purpose of aiding, abetting, or enabling that person or any other person to commit a felony shall, in addition and consecutive to the punishment prescribed by the felony or attempted felony of which the person has been convicted, be punished by an additional term of one, two, or three years in the state prison. The court shall order the middle term unless there are circumstances in aggravation or mitigation. The court shall state the reasons for its enhancement choice on the record at the time of the sentence. The additional term provided in this section shall not be imposed unless the fact of the
 furnishing is charged in the accusatory pleading and admitted or found to be true by the trier
 of fact.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2022.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 508, Sec. 16) by Stats. 2016, Ch. 887, Sec. 16.   (SB 1016)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2022, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

12022.5.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), any person who personally uses a firearm in the commission of a felony or attempted felony shall be punished by an additional and consecutive term of imprisonment in the state prison for 3, 4, or 10 years, unless use of a firearm is an element of that offense.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), any person who personally uses an assault weapon, as specified in Section 30510 or 30515, or a machinegun, as defined in Section 16880, in the commission of a felony or attempted felony, shall be punished by an additional and consecutive term of imprisonment in the state prison
 for 5, 6, or 10 years.

(c) The court may, in the interest of justice pursuant to Section 1385 and at the time of sentencing, strike or dismiss an enhancement otherwise required to be imposed by this section. The authority provided by this subdivision applies to any resentencing that may occur pursuant to any other law.

(d) Notwithstanding the limitation in subdivision (a) relating to being an element of the offense, the additional term provided by this section shall be imposed for any violation of Section 245 if a firearm is used, or for murder if the killing is perpetrated by means of
 shooting a firearm from a motor vehicle, intentionally at another person outside of the vehicle with the intent to inflict great bodily injury or death.

(e) When a person is found to have personally used a firearm, an assault weapon, a machinegun, or a .50 BMG rifle, in the commission of a felony or attempted felony as provided in this section and the firearm, assault weapon, machinegun, or a .50 BMG rifle, is owned by that person, the court shall order that the firearm be deemed a nuisance and disposed of in the manner provided in Sections 18000 and 18005.

(f) For purposes of imposing an enhancement under Section 1170.1, the enhancements under this section shall count as
 one single enhancement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 682, Sec. 1.   (SB 620)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12022.53.

(a) This section applies to the following felonies:

(1) Section 187 (murder).

(2) Section 203 or 205 (mayhem).

(3) Section 207, 209, or 209.5 (kidnapping).

(4) Section 211 (robbery).

(5) Section 215 (carjacking).

(6) Section 220 (assault with intent to commit a specified felony).

(7) Subdivision (d) of Section 245 (assault with a firearm on a peace officer or firefighter).

(8) Section 261 or former Section 262 (rape).

(9) Section 264.1 (rape or sexual penetration in concert).

(10) Section 286 (sodomy).

(11) Section 287 or former Section 288a (oral copulation).

(12) Section 288 or 288.5 (lewd act on a child).

(13) Section 289 (sexual penetration).

(14) Section 4500 (assault by a life prisoner).

(15) Section 4501 (assault by a prisoner).

(16) Section 4503 (holding a hostage by a prisoner).

(17) Any felony punishable by death or imprisonment in the state prison for life.

(18) Any attempt to commit a crime listed in this subdivision other than an assault.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a person who, in the commission of a felony specified in subdivision (a), personally uses a firearm, shall be punished by an additional and consecutive term of imprisonment in the state prison for 10 years. The firearm need not be operable or loaded for this enhancement to apply.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, a person who, in the commission of a felony specified in subdivision (a), personally and intentionally discharges a firearm, shall be punished by an additional and consecutive term of imprisonment in the state prison for 20 years.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, a person who, in the commission of a felony specified in subdivision (a), Section 246, or subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 26100, personally and intentionally discharges a firearm and proximately causes great bodily injury, as defined in Section 12022.7, or death, to a person other than an accomplice, shall be punished by an additional and consecutive term of imprisonment in the state prison for 25 years to life.

(e) (1) The enhancements provided in this section shall apply to any person who is a principal in the commission of an offense if both of the following are pled and proved:

(A) The person violated subdivision (b) of Section 186.22.

(B) Any principal in the offense committed any act
 specified in subdivision (b), (c), or (d).

(2) An enhancement for participation in a criminal street gang pursuant to Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 186.20) of Title 7 of Part 1 shall not be imposed on a person in addition to an enhancement imposed pursuant to this subdivision, unless the person personally used or personally discharged a firearm in the commission of the offense.

(f) Only one additional term of imprisonment under this section shall be imposed per person for each crime. If more than one enhancement per person is found true under this section, the court shall impose upon that person the enhancement that provides the longest term of imprisonment. An enhancement involving a firearm specified in Section 12021.5, 12022, 12022.3, 12022.4, 12022.5, or 12022.55 shall not be imposed on a person in addition to an enhancement imposed pursuant to this section. An
 enhancement for great bodily injury as defined in Section 12022.7, 12022.8, or 12022.9 shall not be imposed on a person in addition to an enhancement imposed pursuant to subdivision (d).

(g) Notwithstanding any other law, probation shall not be granted to, nor shall the execution or imposition of sentence be suspended for, a person found to come within the provisions of this section.

(h) The court may, in the interest of justice pursuant to Section 1385 and at the time of sentencing, strike or dismiss an enhancement otherwise required to be imposed by this section. The authority provided by this subdivision applies to any resentencing that may occur pursuant to any other law.

(i) The total amount of credits awarded pursuant to Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 2930) of Chapter 7 of Title 1 of Part 3 or pursuant to
 Section 4019 or any other law shall not exceed 15 percent of the total term of imprisonment imposed on a defendant upon whom a sentence is imposed pursuant to this section.

(j) For the penalties in this section to apply, the existence of any fact required under subdivision (b), (c), or (d) shall be alleged in the accusatory pleading and either admitted by the defendant in open court or found to be true by the trier of fact. When an enhancement specified in this section has been admitted or found to be true, the court shall impose punishment for that enhancement pursuant to this section rather than imposing punishment authorized under any other law, unless another enhancement provides for a greater penalty or a longer term of imprisonment.

(k) When a person is found to have used or discharged a firearm in the commission of an offense that includes an allegation pursuant to this
 section and the firearm is owned by that person, a coparticipant, or a coconspirator, the court shall order that the firearm be deemed a nuisance and disposed of in the manner provided in Sections 18000 and 18005.

(l) The enhancements specified in this section shall not apply to the lawful use or discharge of a firearm by a public officer, as provided in Section 196, or by any person in lawful self-defense, lawful defense of another, or lawful defense of property, as provided in Sections 197, 198, and 198.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 626, Sec. 65.   (AB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

12022.55.

Notwithstanding Section 12022.5, any person who, with the intent to inflict great bodily injury or death, inflicts great bodily injury, as defined in Section 12022.7, or causes the death of a person, other than an occupant of a motor vehicle, as a result of discharging a firearm from a motor vehicle in the commission of a felony or attempted felony, shall be punished by an additional and consecutive term of imprisonment in the state prison for 5, 6, or 10 years.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 5.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

12022.6.

(a) When any person takes, damages, or destroys any property in the commission or attempted commission of a felony, or commits a felony violation of Section 496, the court shall impose a term in addition and consecutive to the punishment prescribed for the felony or attempted felony of which the defendant has been convicted, as follows:

(1) If the loss or property value exceeds fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), the court shall impose an additional term of one year.

(2) If the loss or property value exceeds two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000), the court shall impose an additional term of two years.

(3) If the loss
 or property value exceeds one million dollars ($1,000,000), the court shall impose an additional term of three years.

(4) If the loss or property value exceeds three million dollars ($3,000,000), the court shall impose an additional term of four years.

(5) For every additional loss or property value of three million dollars ($3,000,000), the court shall impose a term of one year in addition to the term specified in paragraph (4).

(b) In any accusatory pleading involving multiple charges of taking, damage, or destruction, or multiple violations of Section 496, the additional terms provided in this section may be imposed if the aggregate losses to the victims or aggregate property values from all felonies exceed the amounts specified in this section and arise from a common scheme or plan. All pleadings under this
 section shall remain subject to the rules of joinder and severance stated in Section 954.

(c) The additional terms provided in this section shall not be imposed unless the facts relating to the amounts provided in this section are charged in the accusatory pleading and admitted by the defendant or found to be true by the trier of fact.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, the court may impose an enhancement pursuant to this section and another section on a single count, including an enhancement pursuant to Section 12022.65.

(History: Added November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 36, Sec. 11.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 36 at the November 5, 2024, election.)
-------------------------------------------

12022.6.

(a) If a person takes, damages, or destroys property in the commission or attempted commission of a felony, or commits a felony in violation of Section 496, the court shall impose an additional and consecutive term of imprisonment as follows:

(1) If the loss or property value exceeds fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), the court shall impose an additional term of one year.

(2) If the loss or property value exceeds two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000), the court shall impose an additional term of two years.

(3) If the loss or property value exceeds one
 million dollars ($1,000,000), the court shall impose an additional term of three years.

(4) If the loss or property value exceeds three million dollars ($3,000,000), the court shall impose an additional term of four years.

(5) For each additional loss or property value of three million dollars ($3,000,000), the court shall impose a term of one year in addition to the term specified in paragraph (4).

(b) In an accusatory pleading involving multiple charges of taking, damage, or destruction, or multiple violations of Section 496, the additional terms provided in this section may be imposed if the aggregate losses to the victims or aggregate property values from all felonies exceed the amounts specified in this
 section and arise from a common scheme or plan. All pleadings under this section are subject to the rules of joinder and severance stated in Section 954.

(c) The additional terms provided in this section shall not be imposed unless the facts relating to the amounts provided in this section are charged in the accusatory pleading and admitted by the defendant or found to be true by the trier of fact.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, the court may impose an enhancement pursuant to this section and another section on a single count.

(e) It is the
 intent of the Legislature that the provisions of this section be reviewed within five years to consider the effects of inflation on the additional terms imposed. This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute that is enacted before January 1, 2030, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 220, Sec. 1.   (AB 1960)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.   See same-numbered section added by Prop. 36 on Nov. 5, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

12022.65.

(a) Any person who acts in concert with two or more persons to take, attempt to take, damage, or destroy any property, in the commission or attempted commission of a felony shall be punished by an additional and consecutive term of imprisonment of one, two, or three years.

(b) The additional term provided in this section shall not be imposed unless the existence of the facts required in subdivision (a) are charged in the accusatory pleading and admitted by the defendant or found to be true by the trier of fact.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the court may impose an enhancement pursuant to this section and another section on a single count, including an enhancement pursuant to
 Section 12022.6.

(History: Added November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 36, Sec. 12.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 36 at the November 5, 2024, election.)
-------------------------------------------

12022.7.

(a) Any person who personally inflicts great bodily injury on any person other than an accomplice in the commission of a felony or attempted felony shall be punished by an additional and consecutive term of imprisonment in the state prison for three years.
